Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.205

Effect on certain property acquisitions.

The provisions of RCW 8.26.180, 8.26.190, and 8.26.200 create no rights or liabilities and do not affect the validity of any property acquisitions by purchase or condemnation.

[ 1988 c 90 s 15.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.